Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 32 Prepaid or Prearranged Funeral Contracts

Cross references. —

As to embalmers, funeral directors, undertakers and crematories generally, see §§

33-16-101

through

33-16-409

.

As to cemeteries and burials generally, see §§

35-8-101

through

35-8-407

.

Editor's notes. —

As of 1995, §§

26-32-101

through

26-32-103

are designated as Article 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

22A Am. Jur. 2d Dead Bodies § 8; 43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance § 12.

Validity of statutes regulating preneed contracts for the sale or furnishing of burial services and merchandise, 68 ALR2d 1251.

Enforcement of preference expressed by decedent as to disposition of his body after death, 54 ALR3d 1037.

Construction and effect of contracts or insurance policies providing preneed coverage of burial expense or services, 67 ALR4th 36.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes or ordinances regulating perpetual-care trust funds of cemeteries and mausoleums, 54 ALR5th 681.